Vermont, session 2025-2026, S36.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 1901n is added to read:
§ 1901n. HIGH-INTENSITY RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT FOR
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER AND CO-OCCURRING
MENTAL CONDITIONS
(a) The Agency of Human Services shall provide coverage for medically
necessary high-intensity, medically monitored residential treatment episodes to
Medicaid beneficiaries with substance use disorder and a co-occurring mental
health condition when medically necessary high-intensity, medically
monitored residential treatment episodes are prescribed by a health care
professional employed by a residential treatment program who is practicing
within the scope of the health professional’s license and the residential
treatment program is participating in Vermont’s Medicaid program.
(b) Coverage provided under this section shall be for the entire length of
stay prescribed by a health care professional employed by a residential
treatment program, who shall take into account current best practices for each
level of care within the substance use continuum of care.
VT LEG #383898 v.1

No. 22 Page 2 of 7
2025
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. § 1901o is added to read:
§ 1901o. LOW-INTENSITY RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT FOR
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER AND CO-OCCURRING
MENTAL CONDITIONS
(a) The Agency of Human Services shall provide coverage for medically
necessary low-intensity, clinically managed residential treatment episodes to
Medicaid beneficiaries with substance use disorder and a co-occurring mental
health condition when medically necessary low-intensity, clinically managed
residential treatment episodes are prescribed by a health care professional
employed by a residential treatment program who is practicing within the
scope of the health care professional’s license and the residential treatment
program is participating in Vermont’s Medicaid program.
(b) Coverage provided under this section shall be for the entire length of
stay prescribed by a health care professional employed by a residential
treatment program, who shall take into account current best practices for levels
of care within the substance use continuum of care.
Sec. 3. REPORT; MEDICAID PAYMENT MODEL FOR RESIDENTIAL
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT SERVICES
The Agency of Human Services shall conduct a review of the Medicaid
payment model for residential substance use disorder treatment services with
special consideration given to the actual cost of providing residential treatment
services, commensurate with length of stay, co-occurring physical and mental
VT LEG #383898 v.1

No. 22 Page 3 of 7
2025
health needs, and postresidential treatment service needs. The results of the
review shall be submitted to the House Committee on Human Services and the
Senate Committee on Health and Welfare on or before December 1, 2025. The
review shall include recommendations and proposed legislation to:
(1) align the Medicaid payment model with the clinical needs of
individuals receiving residential substance use disorder treatment services; and
(2) ensure coordinated transitions between residential substance use
disorder treatment providers offering varying acuity of care.
Sec. 4. REPEAL
2019 Acts and Resolves No. 6, Secs. 99 and 100 (amendments to 18 V.S.A.
§§ 4810(d)–(j) and 4811 that prohibited persons who are incapacitated from
being incarcerated in a Department of Corrections’ facility) are repealed.
Sec. 5. 2019 Acts and Resolves No. 6, Sec. 105 is amended to read:
Sec. 105. EFFECTIVE DATES
* * *
(c) Secs. 99 and 100 (amending 18 V.S.A. §§ 4910 and 4811) shall take
effect on July 1, 2025. [Deleted.]
* * *
VT LEG #383898 v.1

No. 22 Page 4 of 7
2025
Sec. 6. REPORTS; SERVICES AND PROGRAMMING FOR PERSONS
WHO ARE INCAPACITATED
(a)(1) The Departments of Health and of Mental Health’s existing plan to
expand services and programming for persons who are incapacitated pursuant
to 18 V.S.A. § 4810 shall prioritize Chittenden County.
(2) On or before February 15, 2026, the Departments of Health and of
Mental Health shall jointly provide a presentation to the House Committees on
Health Care and on Human Services and to the Senate Committee on Health
and Welfare describing efforts to expand services and programming for
persons who are incapacitated pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(b) On or before February 15, 2026, the Department of Corrections shall
provide a presentation to the House Committees on Corrections and
Institutions, on Health Care, and on Human Services and to the Senate
Committees on Institutions and on Health and Welfare describing efforts to
reinstate the practice of connecting persons who are in a correctional facility
due to incapacitation pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 4810 with appropriate
community-based substance use recovery providers.
Sec. 7. REPORTS; HUMAN SERVICES BOARD PROCEEDINGS
(a) On or before December 15, 2025, the Agency of Human Services, in
consultation with the Human Services Board, Office of the Attorney General,
each of the Agency’s departments with cases before the Human Services
Board, community partners, and individuals with lived experience as
VT LEG #383898 v.1

No. 22 Page 5 of 7
2025
appellants before the Board, shall submit a written report to the House
Committees on Health Care and on Human Services and to the Senate
Committee on Health and Welfare providing the following information and
recommendations regarding proceedings before the Board:
(1) a proposal that attorneys representing the Agency or departments
participate in training that balances the attorney’s ethical obligation to
zealously represent the attorney’s client with the respectful, trauma-informed
treatment of appellants;
(2) an analysis of varying appeals processes specific to the Agency and
each department with cases before the Board, including proposals and any
legislative action necessary to improve consistency;
(3) a proposal to identify and collect currently unavailable data in a
manner that ensures uniform data collection across the Agency and
departments with cases before the Board, including data regarding cases
resolved prior to reaching the stage of hearing officer or full Board
involvement;
(4) recommendations for resolving potential appeals prior to reaching
the Board; and
(5) any other recommendation requiring legislative action.
(b) On or before December 15, 2025, the Human Services Board, in
collaboration with the Agency of Human Services, each of the Agency’s
departments with cases before the Board, the Office of the Attorney General,
VT LEG #383898 v.1

No. 22 Page 6 of 7
2025
community partners, and individuals with lived experience as appellants before
the Board, shall submit a written report to the House Committees on Health
Care and on Human Services and to the Senate Committee on Health and
Welfare providing the following information and recommendations regarding
proceedings before the Board:
(1) a proposal to improve understanding of Board processes and
accessibility to appellants, including the use of media and graphics to explain
what the Board is and how it operates;
(2) a proposal for the exchange of periodic feedback as part of a
continual quality improvement process between the Board, Agency,
departments appearing before the Board, Office of the Attorney General,
Vermont Legal Aid, and other relevant stakeholders;
(3) an analysis of how to enable an appellant to present a personal
narrative without jeopardizing the appellant’s case or disrupting the legal
obligations of the Board and the attorneys representing the Agency or
departments appearing before the Board; and
(4) recommendations to improve the reporting and analysis of data to
the General Assembly, including information related to appeal requests
resolved prior to reaching the stage of hearing officer or full Board
involvement.
VT LEG #383898 v.1

No. 22 Page 7 of 7
2025
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Date Governor signed bill: May 15, 2025
VT LEG #383898 v.1